District of Columbia, session 26, PR26-0782.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Restoration of Covenanted Roads and Alleys by the District
Government Clarification Emergency Declaration Resolution of 2026”.
Sec. 2. (a) There exists an immediate need to further clarify the District’s authority to
repair certain roads and alleys under the Restoration of Covenanted Roads and Alleys by the
District Government Act of 2024.
(b) In 2024, the Council passed legislation that authorized the Mayor to repair and restore
certain covenanted roadways in the District of Columbia with or without the consent of the
property owner. The law also authorized the Mayor to seek appropriate releases and
indemnification from adjacent property owners, and to recover expenses from private property
owners on behalf of the District if applicable.

(c) The need for law arose from the outreach of several members of the Hillcrest
community in southeast Washington. In 2021, a group of residents requested that a private
alleyway off W Street, SE be repaired as if a public alley so that they could continue to have the
ability to use the driveway to access the rear of their homes. In that case, the owner of record in
the 1960’s had established the alleyway as a condition to obtain city approval of its housing
development, and the alleyway continues to serve several houses. In July 2019, the alleyway
(Lot 811) was sold at a tax sale to a new owner, who filed a foreclosure action in the Superior
Court to extinguish Johnson Brothers’ right to redeem. Several of the neighbors filed a motion to
intervene in the matter attempting to stop the sale. The efforts of the neighbors, coupled with
other government intervention, did result in the tax sale being reversed.
(d) There are similar situations regarding alleys in other places around the city. There is
an unpaved alley off Morris Road, SE that is badly in need of repair. The alley is on the south or
west side of Morris Road, on the block between Mt. View Place and High Street. Residents have
reported that a Department of Public Works (DPW) trash truck got stuck in snow and ice in
previous winters and badly damaged the surface of the alley. However, the alley was never
recorded in the D.C. Surveyor’s Office as a public alley. Nevertheless, the alley is necessary for
trash collection and other city services. Moreover, just as was the case in the Hillcrest situation,
the alley is “L” shaped, and is the only way residents along this portion of Morris Road can park
or put out their trash.
(e) This emergency is necessary to provide the Executive with sufficient authority to
repair the Morris Road, SE and other alleys and roadways that are similarly situated, right now,


prior to what may be another harsh winter in the District. Permanent legislation also will be
introduced to ensure that this authority is available to the Executive on a lasting basis.
Sec. 3. The Council of the District of Columbia finds that the circumstances in section 2
constitute emergency circumstances making it necessary that the Restoration of Covenanted
Roads and Alleys by the District Government Clarification Emergency Declaration Resolution of
2026 be adopted after a single reading.
Sec. 4. This resolution shall take effect immediately.